Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; TEACHER APPRENTICESHIPS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of education for registered apprenticeships for teachers. Of these amounts, $....... each year is for reimbursing school districts for the costs of teacher apprenticeship programs. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) A selected program must include the following five components required for a registered apprenticeship: new text end new text begin (1) involvement by school districts to ensure apprentices develop the skills needed to be effective teachers; new text end new text begin (2) structured on-the-job training from an experienced mentor; new text end new text begin (3) related instruction from a teacher training program approved by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board; new text end new text begin (4) increases in wages for participants as they gain higher skill levels; and new text end new text begin (5) a sequence of training and instruction resulting in a Tier 3 license issued by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board. new text end new text begin (c) School districts are eligible for funding under this section and are encouraged to partner with institutions of higher education, other school districts, charter schools, and cooperative units under Minnesota Statutes, section 123A.24, subdivision 2, to develop eligible teacher apprenticeship programs. new text end new text begin (d) A school district may incorporate a teacher residency or Grow Your Own program into an apprenticeship program under this section and may combine funding under this section with other state teacher recruitment program funding. new text end new text begin (e) Programs that receive funding must consider guidelines for teacher apprenticeship programs developed by other Minnesota apprenticeship programs and other states with existing registered apprenticeship programs. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner of education must consult with the commissioner of labor and industry and the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board to: new text end new text begin (1) determine criteria for awarding funding under this section; new text end new text begin (2) establish oversight over the registered teacher apprenticeship programs; and new text end new text begin (3) develop recommendations for the legislature to improve the effectiveness of teacher apprenticeship programs as a pathway to teacher licensure. new text end new text begin (g) The commissioner of education must report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education, higher education, and workforce development on how teacher apprenticeship program funding was used and recommendations for statutory or rule changes to facilitate improvement of teacher apprenticeship programs as a pathway to teacher licensure. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end